Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section shall apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Authorized tribal official" means any officer or employee of a qualifying federally recognized tribe who has been expressly designated by tribal constitution, ordinance, or resolution as the officer having the authority to invest the funds of the qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political subdivisions thereof.

(2) "Eligible governmental entity" means any county, city, town, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, public corporation, political subdivision, or special purpose taxing district in the state, an instrumentality of any of the foregoing governmental entities created under chapter 39.34 RCW, any agency of state government, any entity issuing or executing and delivering bonds or certificates of participation with respect to financing contracts approved by the state finance committee under RCW 39.94.040, and any qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political subdivisions thereof.

(3) "Financial officer" means the board-appointed treasurer of a community or technical college district, the state board for community and technical colleges, or a public four-year institution of higher education.

(4) "Funds" means:

(a) Funds of an eligible governmental entity under the control of or in the custody of any government finance official or local funds, as defined by the office of financial management publication "Policies, Regulations and Procedures," under the control of or in the custody of a financial officer by virtue of the official's authority that are not immediately required to meet current demands; and

(b) Tribal funds under the control of or in the custody of any qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political subdivisions thereof, where the tribe warrants that the use or disposition of the funds are either not subject to, or are used and deposited with federal approval, and where the tribe warrants that the funds are not immediately required to meet current demands.

(5) "Government finance official" means any officer or employee of an eligible governmental entity who has been designated by statute or by local charter, ordinance, resolution, or other appropriate official action, as the officer having the authority to invest the funds of the eligible governmental entity. However, the county treasurer shall be deemed the only government finance official for all public agencies for which the county treasurer has exclusive statutory authority to invest the funds thereof.

(6) "Public funds investment account" or "investment pool" means the aggregate of all funds as defined in subsection (4) of this section that are placed in the custody of the state treasurer for pooled investment and reinvestment.

(7) "Qualifying federally recognized tribe or federally recognized political subdivisions thereof" means any federally recognized tribe, located in the state of Washington, authorized and empowered by its constitution or ordinance to invest its surplus funds pursuant to this section, and whose authorized tribal official has executed a deposit agreement with the office of the treasurer.

(8) "Separately managed accounts" means both the separately managed public funds investment account and the separately managed state agency investment account.

(9) "Separately managed public funds investment account" means the aggregate of all funds defined in subsection (4) of this section, except those that are remitted by state agencies, that are placed in the custody of the state treasurer for investment and reinvestment in separate portfolios.

(10) "Separately managed state agency investment account" means the aggregate of all funds defined in subsection (4) of this section that are remitted by state agencies and that are placed in the custody of the state treasurer for investment and reinvestment in separate portfolios.

[ 2019 c 163 s 1; 2016 c 152 s 19. Prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 10 s 2; 2001 c 31 s 2; 1996 c 268 s 2; 1990 c 106 s 1; 1986 c 294 s 2.]